Wyoming statutes. Title 34 Property, Conveyances and Security Transactions
Article 1. Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act

§§ 34-14-101 through 34–14–113.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2006, ch. 55, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1926, ch. 8, § 13, pertained to the Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act. For present similar provisions, see §

34-14-201

et seq.